Illinois, session 104th, SB3561.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Buy-Now-Pay-Later Loan Consumer Protection Act. 6    Section 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Applicant" means a person who has submitted an 8application for a license under this Act.9    "Annual percentage rate" means the nominal annual 10percentage rate of finance charge determined in accordance 11with the actuarial method of computation with an accuracy at 12least to the nearest 1/4 of 1% or, at the option of the 13licensee by application of the federal rule, so that it may be 14disclosed with an accuracy at least to the nearest 1/4 of 1%.15    "Buy-now-pay-later loan" or "loan" means closed-end credit 16provided to a consumer at the time of a transaction in 17connection with the consumer's particular purchase of goods or 18services that:19        (1) is payable in 4 or fewer installments; or20        (2) has a term of 120 days or less.21    "Buy-now-pay-later loan" or "loan" includes any other loan 22identified by the Secretary by rule. "Buy-now-pay-later loan" 23or "loan" also includes (i) a buy-now-pay-later loan payable   SB3561 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1in one or more installments without any interest or finance 2charge and (ii) a buy-now-pay-later loan with either interest 3or finance charges or both.4    "Buy-now-pay-later loan" or "loan" does not include credit 5where the creditor is the seller of the goods or services, 6unless it is credit pursuant to an agreement where, at a 7consumer's request, the creditor purchases specific goods or 8services from a seller and resells the specific goods or 9services to the consumer on closed-end credit. 10"Buy-now-pay-later loan" or "loan" also does not include (i) a 11loan for a motor vehicle or (ii) a residential mortgage loan, 12as that term is defined in Section 1-4 of the Residential 13Mortgage License Act of 1987. "Buy-now-pay-later loan" or 14"loan" also does not include any loan to a seller of goods or 15services for the purchase of inventory for sale or resale by 16the seller of goods or services in the normal course of 17business.18    "Consumer" means a natural person who, singly or jointly 19with another consumer, enters into, seeks out, applies for, or 20requests a buy-now-pay-later loan primarily for personal, 21family, or household purposes.22    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 23Professional Regulation.24    "Division" means the Division of Financial Institutions of 25the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.26    "Finance charge" means the cost of financing as a dollar   SB3561 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1amount.2    "Lender" means a person that offers or makes a 3buy-now-pay-later loan to a person in this State or is 4otherwise subject to this Act.5    "Licensee" means a person licensed under this Act.6    "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle which is self-propelled 7and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power 8obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon 9rails, except for vehicles moved solely by human power, 10motorized wheelchairs, low-speed electric bicycles, and 11low-speed gas bicycles.12    "Multistate licensing system" means a third-party, 13multistate licensing system used by the Secretary for 14licensing, examinations, or any other regulatory purpose under 15this Act.16    "Person" means an individual, a partnership, joint 17venture, trust, estate, firm, corporation, cooperative society 18or association, or any other form of business association or 19legal entity. "Person" includes the employees, owners, agents, 20managers, members, principals, and directors of a person.21    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 22Professional Regulation or the Secretary's designee, including 23the Director of the Division of Financial Institutions. 24    Section 3. Administration by the Division of Financial 25Institutions. This Act shall be administered by the Division   SB3561 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1on behalf of the Secretary. 2    Section 4. Licensure requirement. No person shall engage 3in the business regulated by this Act without licensure under 4this Act. The Secretary may investigate any person the 5Secretary believes may require licensure under this Act, 6including, but not limited to, compelling production of 7testimony, books, records, or any other information necessary 8for the Secretary to determine whether the person requires 9licensure. An owner, officer, or employee of a person required 10to be licensed under this Act is not required to be licensed to 11engage in activities conducted by the licensee under this Act. 12    Section 5. Applicability. 13    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Act 14applies to any person, including any affiliate or subsidiary 15of a person, that offers or makes a loan, buys a whole or 16partial interest in a loan, arranges a loan for a third party, 17or acts as an agent for a third party in making a loan to a 18consumer, regardless of whether approval, acceptance, or 19ratification by the third party is necessary to create a legal 20obligation for the third party, and includes any other person 21or entity if the Department determines that the person or 22entity is engaged in a transaction that is in substance a 23disguised loan or a subterfuge for the purpose of avoiding 24this Act. This Act applies to loan transactions conducted by   SB3561 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1any medium, including, but not limited to, paper, facsimile, 2Internet, or telephone. This Act also applies to any servicer 3of a loan offered or made under this Act. This Act does not 4apply to a merchant or merchant platform that makes a 5buy-now-pay-later loan available to a consumer through an 6agreement with a licensed buy-now-pay-later lender or person 7exempt from this Act, if the merchant or merchant platform 8does not originate, underwrite, service, or hold an ownership 9interest in any buy-now-pay-later loan. Notwithstanding the 10provisions of this subsection, this Act also does not apply to 11a person who buys, acquires, or holds a partial interest in a 12loan as a passive investor, but does not otherwise originate, 13underwrite, or service the loan or control the servicing of 14the loan.15    (b) The provisions of this Act apply to any person that 16seeks to evade its applicability by any device, subterfuge, or 17pretense or making, offering, assisting, or arranging for a 18consumer to obtain a loan with a greater rate of interest, 19consideration, or charge than is permitted by this Act through 20any method, including mail, telephone, Internet, or any 21electronic means, regardless of whether the person or entity 22has a physical location in this State. 23    (c) The provisions of this Act apply to any person that 24facilitates or aids or abets a violation of this Act or rules 25adopted under this Act. 26    (d) Banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations,   SB3561 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1credit unions, and insurance companies organized, chartered, 2or holding a certificate of authority to do business under the 3laws of this State, any other state, or the United States are 4exempt from the provisions of this Act and rules adopted under 5this Act. The Secretary may exempt from this Act other persons 6or transactions by rule on a finding that the application of 7the Act to the persons or transactions is not necessary to 8achieve the purposes of this Act. 9    (e) A person is a lender subject to this Act, regardless of 10any claim that the person is acting as an agent, service 11provider, or in another capacity for a person that is exempt 12from this Act, if:13        (1) The person holds, acquires, or maintains, directly 14    or indirectly, the predominant economic interest in the 15    loan.16        (2) The person markets, brokers, arranges, or 17    facilitates the loan and holds the right, requirement, or 18    first right of refusal to purchase the loan or receivables 19    or interests in the loan.20        (3) The totality of the circumstances indicates that 21    the person is the lender and that the transaction is 22    structured to evade the requirements of this Act. 23    Circumstances that support a finding that a person is a 24    lender include, without limitation:25            (A) The person indemnifies, insures, or protects 26        an exempt person or entity for any costs or risks   SB3561 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1        related to the loan.2            (B) The person predominantly designs, controls, or 3        operates the loan program.4            (C) The person purports to act as an agent, 5        service provider, or in another capacity for a person 6        exempt from this Act while acting directly as a lender 7        in other states. 8    Section 5.5. Licensee name. No person engaged in the 9business regulated by this Act shall operate the business 10under a name other than the real name of the person conducting 11business. The business may, as authorized by the Secretary, 12also operate under an assumed corporate name under the 13Business Corporation Act of 1983, an assumed limited liability 14company name under the Limited Liability Company Act, or an 15assumed business name under the Assumed Business Name Act. 16    Section 6. Application process; investigation; fees. 17    (a) The Secretary may issue a license to a person after the 18person completes the following: 19        (1) the filing of an application for licensure with 20    the Secretary or the multistate licensing system, as 21    approved by the Secretary; 22        (2) the filing with the Secretary or the multistate 23    licensing system, as approved by the Secretary, of a 24    listing of judgments entered against, and bankruptcy   SB3561 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    petitions by, the applicant for the preceding 10 years; 2        (3) the payment, in certified funds, of investigation 3    and application fees, the total of which shall be in an 4    amount equal to $5,000, unless modified by the Secretary 5    in accordance with subsection (b) of Section 11; and 6        (4) the filing of an audited balance sheet, including 7    all footnotes prepared by a certified public accountant in 8    accordance with generally accepted accounting principles 9    and generally accepted auditing standards; notwithstanding 10    the requirements of this subsection, an applicant that is 11    a subsidiary may submit audited consolidated financial 12    statements of its parent, intermediary parent, or ultimate 13    parent as long as the consolidated statements are 14    supported by consolidating statements that include the 15    applicant's financial statement; if the consolidating 16    statements are unaudited, the applicant's chief financial 17    officer shall attest to the applicant's financial 18    statements disclosed in the consolidating statements. 19    (b) The Secretary may, for good cause shown, waive or 20modify the requirements of paragraph (4) of subsection (a). 21    (c) Upon receipt of the license, a licensee shall be 22authorized to engage in the business regulated by this Act. 23The license shall remain in full force and effect until it 24expires, is surrendered by the licensee, or is revoked or 25suspended as provided in this Act. 26    (d) The Secretary may impose conditions on a license if   SB3561 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1the Secretary determines that those conditions are necessary 2or appropriate. The conditions shall be imposed in writing and 3shall continue in effect for the period prescribed by the 4Secretary.  5    Section 7. Application form. 6    (a) Application for a license shall be made in accordance 7with this Act and in accordance with requirements of the 8multistate licensing system, if required by the Secretary. The 9application shall be in writing, under oath, and on a form 10obtained from and prescribed by the Secretary. The Secretary 11may require part or all of the application to be submitted 12electronically, with attestation, to the multistate licensing 13system. 14    (b) The application shall contain the name and complete 15business and residential address of the applicant. The 16application shall also include a description of the activities 17of the applicant in such detail and for such periods as the 18Secretary may require, including the following: 19        (1) an affirmation that the applicant and its owners, 20    principals, officers, and directors, as may be 21    appropriate, are at least 18 years of age; 22        (2) information as to the name, complete business 23    address, complete residential address, character, fitness, 24    financial and business responsibility, background, 25    experience, and criminal record of any:   SB3561 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1            (i) person, including an ultimate equitable owner, 2        that directly or indirectly owns or controls 10% or 3        more of any class of stock of the applicant; 4            (ii) person, including an ultimate equitable owner 5        that is not a depository institution, as defined in 6        Section 17.50 of the Savings Bank Act, that lends, 7        provides, or infuses, directly or indirectly, in any 8        way, funds to or into an applicant in an amount equal 9        to or more than 10% of the applicant's net worth; 10            (iii) person, including an ultimate equitable 11        owner that controls, directly or indirectly, the 12        election of 25% or more of the members of the board of 13        directors of an applicant; 14            (iv) person, including an ultimate equitable owner 15        that the Secretary finds influences the management of 16        the applicant; 17            (v) directors of an applicant; and 18            (vi) principal officers of an applicant; and19        (3) any other information as required by the Secretary 20    to assess whether the applicant and its owners, officers, 21    and directors have the financial responsibility, financial 22    condition, business experience, character, and general 23    fitness to justify the confidence of the public and that 24    the applicant and its owners, officers, and directors are 25    fit, willing, and able to carry on the proposed business 26    in a lawful and fair manner.    SB3561 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    Section 8. License application and issuance. 2    (a) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form 3prescribed by the Secretary. The form may be changed or 4updated by the Secretary to carry out the purposes of this Act. 5    (b) In order to fulfill the purposes of this Act, the 6Secretary may establish relationships or contracts with a 7multistate licensing system or other persons to collect and 8maintain records and process fees related to licensees or 9other persons subject to this Act. 10    (c) In connection with an application for licensing, the 11applicant, owners, officers, and directors of an applicant may 12be required, at a minimum, to furnish to the Secretary or the 13multistate licensing system information concerning the 14identity of the applicant, owners, officers, and directors, 15including personal history and experience in a form prescribed 16by the Secretary or the multistate licensing system including, 17but not limited to: 18        (1) a complete and accurate copy of an independent 19    credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency as 20    described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting 21    Act (15 U.S.C. 1681a(p)); and 22        (2) information related to any administrative, civil, 23    or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction. 24    (d) For the purposes of this Section, and to reduce the 25points of contact that the Secretary may have to maintain, the   SB3561 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1Secretary may use a multistate licensing system as a 2channeling agent for requesting and distributing information 3to and from any source. 4    (e) Each application shall be accompanied by averments as 5determined by the Secretary to fulfill the purposes of this 6Act.  7    Section 9. Refusal to issue license. The Secretary may 8refuse to issue or renew a license if the Secretary determines 9that:10        (a) the applicant has not complied with a provision of 11    this Act, rule adopted under this Act, or other laws that 12    apply to the applicant; 13        (b) there is substantial continuity between the 14    applicant and any violator of this Act, rule adopted under 15    this Act, or other laws that apply to the applicant or 16    related violator; and 17        (c) the applicant or its owners, officers, or 18    directors do not have the financial responsibility, 19    financial condition, business experience, character, and 20    general fitness to justify the confidence of the public 21    and that the license applicant and its owners, officers, 22    and directors are not fit, willing, and able to carry on 23    the proposed business in a lawful and fair manner.  24    Section 10. License issuance and renewal.   SB3561 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    (a) Absent a written extension from the Department and 2payment of any late fees required by the Department, a license 3shall expire on the last day of December of each calendar year 4if a licensee fails to timely submit a properly completed 5renewal application form and fees. 6    (b) Licensees shall apply to renew their license every 7calendar year. Licensees may submit properly completed renewal 8application forms and filing fees 60 days before the license 9expiration date. To be deemed timely, the completed renewal 10application forms and filing fees must be received by the 11Secretary at least 30 days before the license expiration date. 12    (c) It shall be the responsibility of each licensee to 13accomplish timely renewal of its license. 14    (d) No activity regulated by this Act shall be conducted 15by a licensee whose license has expired. The Secretary may, 16within the Secretary's discretion, reinstate an expired 17license upon payment of the renewal fee, payment of a 18reactivation fee equal to 5 times the renewal fee, submission 19of a completed renewal application, and an affidavit of good 20cause for late renewal.  21    Section 11. Fees. 22    (a) The expenses of administering this Act, including 23licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 24this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 25entities regulated by this Act in the proportions and in the   SB3561 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1manner as the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary may 2establish by rule the category and amount of any fees that the 3person and entities pay to the Department. 4    (b) The Secretary may modify any fees established by this 5Act by rule beginning one year after the effective date of this 6Act.  7    Section 12. Functions; powers; duties. The functions, 8powers, and duties of the Secretary shall include, but shall 9not be limited to:10        (a) to issue or refuse to issue any license or 11    renewal; 12        (b) to impose fines, revoke, or suspend for cause any 13    license issued under this Act; 14        (c) to impose fines for any unlicensed activity under 15    this Act; 16        (d) to keep records of all licenses issued under this 17    Act; 18        (e) to receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 19    complaints made by any person in connection with any 20    licensee in this State or unlicensed activity under this 21    Act of any person; 22        (f) to prescribe the forms of and receive: 23            (1) applications for licenses and renewals; and 24            (2) all reports and all books and records required 25        to be made by any licensee, including annual audited   SB3561 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1        financial statements if required by the Secretary and 2        annual reports of activity; 3        (g) to adopt rules necessary and proper for the 4    administration of this Act, to protect consumers and to 5    promote fair competition; 6        (h) to subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 7    attendance and production, to administer oaths, and to 8    require the production of any books, papers, or other 9    materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act 10    or rules adopted under this Act; 11        (i) to issue orders against any person if the 12    Secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an unsafe, 13    unsound, or unlawful practice has occurred, is occurring, 14    or is about to occur; if any person is violating, or is 15    about to violate any law, rule, or written agreement with 16    the Secretary; or for the purpose of administering the 17    provisions of this Act and any rule adopted in accordance 18    with this Act; 19        (j) to address any inquiries to any licensee, or the 20    owners, officers, or directors, in relation to its 21    activities and conditions, or any other matter connected 22    with its affairs, and it shall be the duty of any licensee 23    or person so addressed to promptly reply in writing to 24    those inquiries; and to require reports from any licensee 25    at any time the Secretary may deem desirable; 26        (k) to examine the books and records of every licensee   SB3561 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    or any person requiring a license or who the Secretary 2    reasonably believes may require a license at any time 3    interval reasonably determined appropriate by the 4    Secretary; 5        (l) to enforce provisions of this Act and rules 6    adopted under this Act; 7        (m) to levy fees including, but not limited to, 8    contingent fees, assessments, examination fees, licensing 9    fees, fines, and charges for services performed in 10    administering this Act; 11        (n) to issue refunds to licensees within one year of 12    any overpayment for good cause shown; 13        (o) to appoint examiners, supervisors, experts, and 14    special assistants as needed to effectively and 15    efficiently administer this Act; 16        (p) to conduct hearings for the purpose of carrying 17    out the purposes of this Act; 18        (q) to exercise visitorial power over a licensee; 19        (r) to enter into cooperative agreements with state 20    regulatory authorities of other states to provide for 21    examination of corporate offices or branches in those 22    states, participate in joint examinations with other 23    regulators, and to accept reports of the examinations; 24        (s) to assign an examiner or examiners to monitor the 25    affairs of a licensee with whatever frequency the 26    Secretary determines appropriate and to charge the   SB3561 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    licensee for reasonable and necessary expenses of the 2    Secretary if in the opinion of the Secretary an emergency 3    exists or appears likely to occur; 4        (t) to impose civil penalties of up to $1,000 per day 5    against a licensee for failing to respond to a regulatory 6    request or reporting requirement; and 7        (u) to enter into agreements in connection with a 8    multistate licensing system.  9    Section 13. Financial Institutions Fund. All moneys 10received by the Secretary under this Act shall be paid into the 11Financial Institutions Fund. The amounts deposited into the 12Fund shall be used for the ordinary and contingent expenses of 13the Department. Nothing in this Act shall prevent paying 14expenses involving salaries, retirement, social security, and 15State-paid insurance of State employees, or any other expenses 16incurred under this Act by appropriation from the General 17Revenue Fund, PIC Fund, or any other fund. 18    Section 14. Examination; prohibited activities. 19    (a) The Secretary shall examine the business affairs of a 20licensee as often as the Secretary deems necessary and proper. 21The Secretary may adopt rules with respect to the frequency 22and manner of examination. The Secretary shall appoint a 23suitable person to perform the examination. The Secretary and 24the Secretary's appointees may examine the entire books,   SB3561 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1records, documents, and operations of each licensee and its 2subsidiary, affiliate, or agent, and may examine any of the 3licensee's or its subsidiaries', owners', affiliates', or 4agents' officers, directors, employees, and agents under oath. 5    (b) Affiliates of a licensee shall be subject to 6examination by the Secretary only to the extent reasonably 7necessary to evaluate the licensee's compliance with this Act 8and only with respect to records directly related to the 9licensee's regulated activities under this Act. 10    (c) The expenses of any examination of the licensee or its 11affiliates shall be borne by the licensee and assessed by the 12Secretary as may be established by rule. 13    (d) All confidential supervisory information, including 14the examination report and the work papers of the report, 15shall belong to the Secretary's office and may not be 16disclosed to anyone other than the licensee, law enforcement 17officials, or other regulatory agencies that have an 18appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the 19Secretary, or to a party presenting a lawful subpoena to the 20Department. The Secretary may, through the Attorney General, 21immediately appeal to the court of jurisdiction the disclosure 22of the confidential supervisory information and seek a stay of 23the subpoena pending the outcome of the appeal. Reports 24required of licensees by the Secretary under this Act and 25results of examinations performed by the Secretary under this 26Act shall be the property of only the Secretary, but may be   SB3561 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1shared with the licensee. Any person demanded to produce the 2Department's confidential supervisory information, whether by 3subpoena, order, or other judicial or administrative process, 4shall withhold production of the confidential supervisory 5information and notify the Secretary of the demand. The 6Secretary may intervene for the purpose of enforcing the 7limitations of this Section or seeking the withdrawal or 8termination of the attempt to compel production of the 9confidential supervisory information. The Secretary may impose 10any conditions and limitations on the disclosure of 11confidential supervisory information that are necessary to 12protect the confidentiality of that information. The Secretary 13may condition a decision to disclose confidential supervisory 14information on entry of a protective order by the court or 15administrative tribunal presiding in the particular case or on 16a written agreement of confidentiality. In a case in which a 17protective order or agreement has already been entered between 18parties other than the Secretary, the Secretary may 19nevertheless condition approval for release of confidential 20supervisory information upon the inclusion of additional or 21amended provisions in the protective order. The Secretary may 22authorize a party who obtained the records for use in one case 23to provide them to a party in another case, subject to any 24conditions that the Secretary may impose on either or both 25parties. The requester shall promptly notify other parties to 26a case of the release of confidential supervisory information   SB3561 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1obtained and, upon entry of a protective order, shall provide 2copies of confidential supervisory information to the other 3parties.  4    Section 15. Subpoena power of the Secretary. 5    (a) The Secretary shall have the power to issue and to 6serve subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum to compel the 7attendance of witnesses and the production of all books, 8accounts, records, and other documents and materials relevant 9to an examination or investigation. The Secretary or the 10Secretary's duly appointed representative shall have the power 11to administer oaths and affirmations to any person. 12    (b) If a person does not comply with the Secretary's 13subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, the Secretary may, through 14the Attorney General, petition the circuit court of the county 15in which the subpoenaed person resides or has its principal 16place of business for an order requiring the subpoenaed person 17to testify and to comply with the subpoena duces tecum. 18    (c) The court may grant injunctive relief restraining the 19person from engaging in activity regulated by this Act. The 20court may grant other relief, including, but not limited to, 21the restraint, by injunction or appointment of a receiver, of 22any transfer, pledge, assignment, or other disposition of the 23person's assets, concealment, destruction, or other 24disposition of books, accounts, records, or other documents 25and materials as the court deems appropriate, until the person   SB3561 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1has fully complied with the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum 2and the Secretary has completed an investigation or 3examination. 4    (d) If it appears to the Secretary that the compliance 5with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued or caused to be 6issued by the Secretary under this Section is essential to an 7investigation or examination, the Secretary, in addition to 8the other remedies provided for in this Act, may, through the 9Attorney General, apply for relief to the circuit court of the 10county in which the subpoenaed person resides or has its 11principal place of business. The court shall direct the 12issuance of an order against the subpoenaed person requiring 13sufficient bond conditioned on compliance with the subpoena or 14subpoena duces tecum. The court shall cause to be endorsed on 15the order a suitable amount of bond or payment under which the 16person named shall be freed, having a due regard to the nature 17of the case. 18    (e) In addition, the Secretary may, through the Attorney 19General, seek a writ of attachment or an equivalent order from 20the circuit court having jurisdiction over the person who has 21refused to obey a subpoena, who has refused to give testimony, 22or who has refused to produce the matters described in the 23subpoena duces tecum.  24    Section 16. Reports required of licensee. Every licensee 25shall produce to the Department written reports or answers to   SB3561 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1questions in the time and manner requested by the Secretary. 2    Section 17. Suspension; revocation of licenses; fines and 3other discipline. 4    (a) The Secretary may enter an order imposing one or more 5of the following penalties: 6        (1) revocation of license; 7        (2) suspension of a license subject to reinstatement 8    upon satisfying all reasonable conditions the Secretary 9    may specify; 10        (3) placement of the licensee or applicant on 11    probation for a period of time and subject to all 12    reasonable conditions as the Secretary may specify; 13        (4) issuance of a reprimand; 14        (5) imposition of a civil penalty or fine not to 15    exceed $25,000 for each count of separate offense; 16        (6) restitution, refunds, or any other relief 17    necessary to protect consumers; and 18        (7) denial of a license. 19    (b) Grounds for penalties include: 20        (1) that a person has violated or aided another to 21    violate, any provisions of this Act, any rule adopted by 22    the Secretary, or any other law, rule, or regulation of 23    this State, any other state, or the United States; 24        (2) that any fact or condition exists that, if it had 25    existed at the time of the original application for the   SB3561 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    license, would have warranted the Secretary in refusing to 2    issue the original license; 3        (3) that a licensee that is not an individual has 4    acted or failed to act in a way that would be cause for 5    suspending or revoking a license to an individual; 6        (4) that a person engaged in unsafe, unsound, unfair, 7    deceptive, or abusive business practices related to the 8    activity covered by this Act;9        (5) that a person has been adjudicated guilty of a 10    crime against the law of this State, any other state, or of 11    the United States involving moral turpitude, abusive, 12    deceptive, fraudulent, or dishonest dealing; 13        (6) that a final judgment has been entered against a 14    person in a civil action upon grounds of abusive conduct, 15    conversion, fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit; 16        (7) that a person made a material misstatement in its 17    application for licensure or any other communication to 18    the Secretary; 19        (8) that a person has demonstrated by course of 20    conduct, negligence or incompetence in performing any act 21    for which it is required to hold a license under this Act; 22        (9) that a person has failed to advise the Secretary 23    in writing of any changes to the information submitted on 24    the person's most recent application for license within 30 25    days after the change; 26        (10) that a licensee failed to submit to periodic   SB3561 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    examination by the Secretary as required by this Act or 2    failed to maintain, preserve, and keep available for 3    examination all books, accounts, or other documents 4    required by the provisions of this Act and rules adopted 5    under this Act for a period of at least 2 years after the 6    loan is paid in full or any time period set forth by rule; 7        (11) that a person failed to account or deliver to any 8    person any property, such as any money, fund, deposit, 9    check, draft, or other document or thing of value, that 10    has come into the person's possession and that is not the 11    person's property or that the person is not in law or 12    equity entitled to retain, under the circumstances and at 13    the time which has been agreed upon or is required by law 14    or, in the absence of a fixed time, upon demand of the 15    person for the accounting and delivery; 16        (12) that a person failed to disburse funds in 17    accordance with agreements or law; 18        (13) that a person had a license, or the equivalent, 19    to practice any profession, occupation, other industry or 20    activity requiring licensure revoked, suspended, 21    disciplined, or otherwise acted against, including the 22    denial of licensure by a licensing authority of this State 23    or another state, territory, or country for fraud, 24    dishonest dealing, misrepresentations, incompetence, 25    conversion, any act of moral turpitude or any other 26    grounds that would constitute grounds for discipline under   SB3561 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    this Act; 2        (14) that a person licensed under this Act failed to 3    timely notify the Department that the person has been 4    disciplined by a licensing authority of this State or 5    another state;6        (15) that a person engaged in activities regulated by 7    the Act without a current, active license unless 8    specifically exempted by this Act; 9        (16) that a person failed to timely pay any fee, 10    charge, or fine assessed under this Act; and 11        (17) that a person refused, obstructed, evaded, or 12    unreasonably delayed an investigation, information 13    request, or examination authorized under this Act, or 14    refused, obstructed, evaded, or unreasonably delayed 15    compliance with the Secretary's subpoena or subpoena duces 16    tecum. 17    (c) No license shall be suspended or revoked, except as 18provided in this Section nor shall any licensee be fined, 19without notice of the licensee's right to a hearing. 20    (d) The Secretary may suspend any license for a period not 21exceeding 90 days pending investigation for good cause shown 22that an emergency exists. 23    (e) No revocation, suspension, or surrender of any license 24shall impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting 25lawful contract between the licensee and any person. The 26Secretary's approval of a licensee's application to surrender   SB3561 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1its license shall not affect the licensee's civil or criminal 2liability for acts committed prior to surrender. Surrender of 3a license does not entitle the licensee to a return of any part 4of the fee for initial licensure or any part of the fee for 5annual license renewal. 6    (f) Every license issued under this Act shall remain in 7force and effect until the license expires, is surrendered, is 8revoked, or is suspended in accordance with the provisions of 9this Act. The Secretary may reinstate a suspended license or 10issue a new license to a licensee whose license has been 11revoked or surrendered if no fact or condition then exists 12which would have warranted the Secretary in refusing 13originally to issue that license under this Act. 14    (g) If the Secretary imposes discipline authorized by this 15Section, the Secretary shall execute a written order to that 16effect. The Secretary shall serve a copy of the order upon the 17person. The Secretary shall serve the person with notice of 18the order, including a statement of the reasons for the order, 19either personally, or by certified mail. Service by certified 20mail shall be deemed completed when the notice is deposited 21into the U.S. Mail. 22    (h) An order assessing a fine, an order imposing 23conditions upon a license, an order revoking or suspending a 24license, or an order denying renewal of a license shall take 25effect upon service of the order unless the licensee serves 26the Department with a written request for a hearing in the   SB3561 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1manner required by the notice within 20 days after the date of 2service of the order. If a person requests a hearing, the order 3shall be stayed from its date of service until the Department 4enters a final administrative order. 5        (1) If the licensee requests a hearing, the Secretary 6    shall schedule a preliminary hearing within 90 days after 7    the request for a hearing unless otherwise agreed to by 8    the parties. 9        (2) The preliminary hearing shall be held at the time 10    and place designated by the Secretary. The Secretary and 11    any administrative law judge designated by the Secretary 12    shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, 13    subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take 14    evidence, and require the production of books, papers, 15    correspondence, and other records or information that the 16    Secretary considers relevant or material to the inquiry. 17    (i) The costs of administrative hearings conducted under 18this Section shall be paid by the licensee or other person 19subject to the hearing. 20    (j) A licensee and other persons subject to this Act shall 21be subject to the disciplinary actions specified in this Act 22for any violations conducted by any officer, director, 23shareholder, joint venture, partner, owner, including, but not 24limited to, ultimate equitable owner.  25    Section 18. Investigation of complaints. The Secretary may   SB3561 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1investigate any complaints and inquiries made concerning this 2Act and any licensees or persons the Secretary believes may 3require a license under this Act. Each licensee or person the 4Secretary believes may require a license under this Act shall 5open the licensee or person's books, records, documents, and 6offices wherever situated to the Secretary as needed to 7facilitate the investigations. 8    Section 19. Additional investigation and examination 9authority. In addition to any authority allowed under this 10Act, the Secretary shall have the authority to conduct 11investigations and examinations as follows:12        (a) For purposes of initial licensing, license 13    renewal, license suspension, license conditioning, license 14    probation, license revocation or termination, or general 15    or specific inquiry or investigation to determine 16    compliance with this Act, the Secretary shall have the 17    authority to access, receive, and use any books, accounts, 18    records, files, documents, information, or evidence, 19    including, but not limited to, the following: 20            (1) criminal, civil, licensure, and administrative 21        history information, including nonconviction data as 22        specified in the Criminal Identification Act; 23            (2) personal history and experience information, 24        including independent credit reports obtained from a 25        consumer reporting agency described in Section 603(p)   SB3561 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1        of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; and 2            (3) any other documents, information, or evidence 3        the Secretary deems relevant to the inquiry or 4        investigation, regardless of the location, possession, 5        control, or custody of the documents, information, or 6        evidence. 7        (b) For the purposes of investigating violations or 8    complaints arising under this Act or for the purposes of 9    examination, the Secretary may review, investigate, or 10    examine any licensee, individual, or person subject to 11    this Act as often as necessary in order to carry out the 12    purposes of this Act. The Secretary may direct, subpoena, 13    or order the attendance of, and examine under oath all 14    persons; and order any person to produce records, files, 15    and any other documents the Secretary deems relevant to an 16    inquiry. 17        (c) Each person subject to this Act shall make 18    available to the Secretary upon request the books and 19    records relating to the operations of the person subject 20    to this Act. The Secretary shall have access to those 21    books and records and may interview the owners, officers, 22    principals, employees, independent contractors, agents, 23    vendors, and customers of any licensee or person subject 24    to this Act. 25        (d) Each person subject to this Act shall make or 26    compile reports or prepare other information as directed   SB3561 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    by the Secretary to carry out the purposes of this 2    Section, including, but not limited to: 3            (1) accounting compilations; 4            (2) information lists and data concerning 5        transactions in a format prescribed by the Secretary; 6        or 7            (3) other information deemed necessary to carry 8        out the purposes of this Section. 9        (e) In making any examination or investigation 10    authorized by this Act, the Secretary may control access 11    to any documents and records of the licensee or person 12    under examination or investigation. The Secretary may take 13    possession of the documents and records or otherwise take 14    constructive control of the documents. During the period 15    of control, no person shall remove or alter any of the 16    documents or records, except in accordance with a court 17    order or with the consent of the Secretary. Unless the 18    Secretary has reasonable grounds to believe the documents 19    or records of the licensee have been or are at risk of 20    being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a 21    violation of this Act, the licensee or owner of the 22    documents and records shall have access to the documents 23    or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business 24    affairs. 25        (f) In order to carry out the purposes of this 26    Section, the Secretary may:   SB3561 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1            (1) retain attorneys, accountants, or other 2        professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, 3        or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct 4        of examinations or investigations; 5            (2) enter into agreements or relationships with 6        other government officials or regulatory associations 7        to protect consumers, improve efficiencies, and reduce 8        regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized 9        or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, 10        records, information, or evidence obtained under this 11        Section; 12            (3) use, hire, contract, or employ publicly or 13        privately available analytical systems, methods, or 14        software to examine or investigate the licensee, 15        individual, or person subject to this Act; 16            (4) accept and rely on examination or 17        investigation reports made by other government 18        officials, within or outside this State; or 19            (5) accept audit reports made by an independent 20        certified public accountant for the person subject to 21        this Act and incorporate the audit report in the 22        report of the examination, report of investigation, or 23        other writing of the Secretary. 24        (g) The authority of this Section shall remain in 25    effect, whether a person subject to this Act acts or 26    claims to act under any licensing or registration law of   SB3561 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    this State or claims to act without authority. 2        (h) No licensee or person subject to investigation or 3    examination under this Section may knowingly withhold, 4    alter, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, hide, or 5    conceal any books, records, computer records, or other 6    information or take actions designed to delay or 7    complicate review of records.  8    Section 20. Confidentiality. To promote more effective 9regulation, protect consumers, and reduce regulatory burden 10through inter-regulator sharing of confidential supervisory 11information:12        (a) The privacy or confidentiality of any information 13    or material provided to the multistate licensing system, 14    including all privileges arising under federal or State 15    court rules and law, shall continue to apply to the 16    information or material after the information or material 17    has been disclosed to the multistate licensing system. 18    Information and material may be shared with the multistate 19    licensing system, federal and state regulatory officials 20    with relevant oversight authority, and law enforcement 21    without the loss of privilege or the loss of 22    confidentiality protections. 23        (b) The Secretary may enter into agreements or sharing 24    arrangements with other governmental agencies, the 25    Conference of State Bank Supervisors, and other   SB3561 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    associations representing governmental agencies. 2        (c) Information or material that is privileged or 3    confidential under this Act as determined by the Secretary 4    shall not be subject to the following: 5            (1) disclosure under any State law governing the 6        disclosure to the public of information held by an 7        officer or an agency of this State; or 8            (2) subpoena, discovery, or admission into 9        evidence, in any private civil action or 10        administrative process except as authorized by the 11        Secretary. 12        (d) Any other law relating to the disclosure of 13    confidential supervisory information that is inconsistent 14    with this Act shall be superseded by the requirements of 15    this Section to the extent the other law provides less 16    confidentiality or a weaker privilege for information that 17    is privileged or confidential under this Act. 18        (e) Confidential or privileged information received 19    from the multistate licensing system, another licensing 20    body, federal and state regulatory officials, or law 21    enforcement shall be protected to the same extent as the 22    Secretary's confidential and privileged information is 23    protected under this Act. The Secretary may also protect 24    from disclosure confidential or privileged information 25    that would be exempt from disclosure to the extent it is 26    held directly by the multistate licensing system, another   SB3561 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    licensing body, federal and state regulatory officials, or 2    law enforcement.  3    Section 21. Rules. 4    (a) In addition to the powers set forth in this Act and 5other laws, the Secretary may adopt rules consistent with the 6purposes of this Act, including, but not limited to, rules to: 7        (1) protect consumers in this State in connection with 8    the activities of persons subject to this Act; 9        (2) define improper, deceptive, unfair, abusive, or 10    fraudulent business practices in connection with providing 11    products and services under this Act;12        (3) define terms used in this Act to interpret and 13    implement this Act; 14        (4) promote competition and price transparency; and 15        (5) enforce the provisions of this Act. 16    (b) The Secretary may make specific rulings, demands, and 17findings deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the 18buy-now-pay-later loan industry.  19    Section 22. Appeal and review. 20    (a) The Secretary may, in accordance with the Illinois 21Administrative Procedure Act, adopt rules to provide for 22review within the Department of the Secretary's decisions 23affecting the rights of persons under this Act. The review 24shall provide for, at a minimum:   SB3561 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1        (1) appointment of a hearing officer; 2        (2) appropriate procedural rules, specific deadlines 3    for filings, and standards of evidence and of proof; and 4        (3) provisions for apportioning costs among parties to 5    the appeal. 6    (b) All final agency determinations of appeals to 7decisions of the Secretary may be reviewed in accordance with 8and under the provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 9Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by a court 10in review of any final administrative decision of the 11Secretary or of any final agency review of a decision of the 12Secretary may be taken as in other civil cases.  13    Section 23. Licensure fees. 14    (a) The nonrefundable fee for initial licensure shall be 15$5,000, unless modified by the Secretary in accordance with 16subsection (b) of Section 11.17    (b) The nonrefundable fee for annual license renewal shall 18be $5,000, unless modified by the Secretary in accordance with 19subsection (b) of Section 11.20    (c) The Department shall impose a contingent fee 21sufficient to cover its operating expenses in administering 22this Act not otherwise covered by all other revenue collected 23under this Act. Each licensee shall pay to the Division its pro 24rata share, based on number or volume of transactions or 25revenue or any other metric established by the Department by   SB3561 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1rule, of the cost for administration of the Act that exceeds 2other fees listed in this Section, as estimated by the 3Division, for the current year and any deficit actually 4incurred in the administration of the Act in prior years.  5    Section 24. Cease and desist order. 6    (a) The Secretary may issue a cease and desist order to any 7licensee or person doing business without the required 8license, when in the opinion of the Secretary the licensee or 9other person has violated, is violating, or is about to 10violate any provision of this Act or any rule adopted by the 11Department under this Act or any requirement imposed in 12writing by the Department as a condition of granting any 13authorization permitted by this Act. The cease and desist 14order authorized by this Section may be issued prior to a 15hearing. 16    (b) The Secretary shall serve notice of the order, either 17personally or by certified mail. Service by certified mail 18shall be deemed completed when the notice is deposited into 19the U.S. Mail. The Secretary's notice shall include a 20statement of the reasons for the action. 21    (c) Within 15 days after service of the cease and desist 22order, the person subject to the order may request a hearing in 23writing. The Secretary shall schedule a preliminary hearing 24within 60 days after the request for a hearing unless the 25parties agree to a later date.   SB3561 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    (d) If it is determined that the Secretary had the 2authority to issue the cease and desist order, the Secretary 3may issue orders as may be reasonably necessary to correct, 4eliminate, deter, or remedy the conduct described in the order 5and resulting harms. 6    (e) The powers vested in the Secretary by this Section are 7additional to all other powers and remedies vested in the 8Secretary by any law. Nothing in this Section shall be 9construed as requiring that the Secretary must employ the 10power conferred in this subsection instead of or as a 11condition precedent to the exercise of any other power or 12remedy vested in the Secretary.  13    Section 25. Injunction. The Secretary may maintain an 14action in the name of the people of the State of Illinois 15through the Attorney General and may apply for an injunction 16in the circuit court to enjoin a person from violating this Act 17or rules adopted under this Act. 18    Section 26. Underwriting. A lender shall, before providing 19or causing to be provided a loan to a consumer, perform, or 20cause to be performed, reasonable risk-based underwriting 21which shall include, at a minimum, an assessment of the 22outstanding loans taken out by the consumer from the lender. A 23lender shall also, before providing or causing to be provided 24a loan to a consumer, take into consideration the financial   SB3561 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1ability of the borrower to repay the loan in the time and 2manner provided in the loan contract. A lender shall maintain 3or cause to be maintained policies and procedures for 4underwriting loans, and shall disclose factors considered in 5the underwriting process, in a clear and conspicuous manner to 6the consumer. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 7require a lender to disclose proprietary underwriting models, 8anti-fraud criteria, or trade secrets to the public. No lender 9shall collect, evaluate, report, or maintain in the file on a 10borrower the credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit 11capacity of members of the borrower's social network for 12purposes of determining the credit worthiness of the borrower; 13the average credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit 14capacity of members of the borrower's social network; or any 15group score that is not the borrower's own credit worthiness, 16credit standing, or credit capacity. The Department may adopt 17rules with respect to underwriting. 18    Section 27. Consumer protections. 19    (a) A lender shall provide the following disclosures to a 20consumer, in a clear and conspicuous manner, at the time of 21extending a specific offer of a loan: 22        (1) how to file a complaint with the Department; 23        (2) the terms of buy-now-pay-later loans, including, 24    without limitation, the cost, such as interest and fees, 25    the repayment schedule, the means by which a person may   SB3561 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    dispute billing practices, whether the transaction will or 2    will not be reported to a credit reporting agency, and 3    other material conditions, in a clear and conspicuous 4    manner and in a manner that complies with applicable 5    federal regulations, including, but not limited to, 6    Regulation Z of Title I of the Consumer Credit Protection 7    Act; 8        (3) factors considered in the underwriting process; 9    and10        (4) Any other disclosures required by the Secretary by 11    rule. 12    (b) A lender shall comply with the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act 13Privacy Rule, Section 624 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 14U.S.C. 1681s-3), and their implementing regulations.15    (c) A lender shall resolve disputes in a manner that is 16fair and transparent to consumers. A lender shall create a 17readily available and prominently disclosed method for 18consumers to bring a dispute to the lender. A lender shall 19maintain policies and procedures for handling consumer 20disputes. A lender shall apply to loans the dispute rights and 21unauthorized charges requirements that apply to credit cards 22under the federal Truth in Lending Act, regardless of whether 23the law applies to loans or whether the lender offers a credit 24card within the scope of the law. 25    (d) A lender shall provide refunds or credits for goods or 26services purchased in connection with a loan, if the consumer   SB3561 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1requests and is entitled to a refund, in a manner that is fair, 2transparent, and not unduly burdensome to consumers. A lender 3shall maintain policies and procedures to provide the refunds 4or credits. The policies and procedures shall be fair, 5transparent, and not unduly burdensome to the consumer. A 6lender shall disclose to consumers, in a clear and conspicuous 7manner, the process by which they can obtain refunds or 8credits for goods or services they have purchased in 9connection with a loan. 10    (e) A lender shall not require consumers to authorize 11automatic payment from the consumer's accounts. If a consumer 12voluntarily elects to use automatic payments in relation to 13the loan, the lender shall not charge the consumer any amount 14to cancel automatic payments should the consumer request to do 15so. 16    (f) A lender shall not require payment by a consumer by 17credit card.18    (g) A lender shall not attempt to debit a consumer's 19account if it is notified that there are insufficient funds to 20pay in the account or if it has reason to believe there are 21insufficient funds to pay in the account without seeking 22additional, express approval from the consumer. A lender shall 23present an ACH debit for payment not more than twice. 24    (h) The lender's license shall be kept conspicuously 25posted on the mobile application, website, or other consumer 26interface of the lender, as well as listed in the terms and   SB3561 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1conditions of any loan offered or entered into by the lender. 2    (i) A consumer shall be permitted to pay off the loan at 3any time. A lender may not impose, directly or indirectly, any 4additional fee or finance charge other than interest accrued 5since the consumer's last payment or the start of the loan if 6the consumer elects to pay off or refinance the loan before 7full repayment. 8    (j) A lender may not accept tips, expedited payment fees, 9or any other fee identified by the Department by rule from 10consumers. Additionally, the Department may limit any fee, 11charge, or payment which may be charged to a consumer by a 12lender.13    (k) A lender shall maintain policies and procedures for 14underwriting buy-now-pay-later loans and follow the policies 15and procedures when underwriting loans under this Act.16    (l) All requirements set forth in this Section or in any 17rules adopted by the Department relating to servicing of a 18loan shall apply to a subsequent purchaser or assignee of a 19loan, an agent of the lender, or any other person servicing a 20loan. 21    Section 27.5. Compliance with federal law. All disclosures 22required by this Act shall be made in a manner that complies 23with the federal Truth in Lending Act, amendments thereto, and 24any regulations issued or which may be issued thereunder.   SB3561 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1    Section 28. Rate cap. A loan entered into under this Act is 2subject to the rate cap set forth in Section 15-5-5 of the 3Predatory Loan Prevention Act. 4    Section 29. Nullification of loans. Any loan made by a 5person not licensed or otherwise exempt under this Act is null 6and void and no person or entity shall have any right to 7collect, attempt to collect, receive, or retain any principal, 8fee, interest, or charges related to the loan. 9    Section 30. Annual report. The Secretary may require an 10annual report from all licensees in a form and manner 11prescribed by the Secretary. The Department may publish 12reports containing a compilation of aggregate data concerning 13the buy-now-pay-later loan industry. 14    Section 31. Surety bond. 15    (a) An applicant for a license shall post and a licensee 16must maintain with the Secretary a bond or bonds issued by 17corporations qualified to do business as surety companies in 18this State. 19    (b) The applicant or licensee shall post a bond in a 20minimum amount of $50,000. If the Secretary finds at any time 21that a bond is of insufficient size, is insecure, exhausted, 22or otherwise doubtful, an additional bond in the amount as 23determined by the Secretary shall be filed by the licensee   SB3561 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1within 30 days after written demand by the Secretary. 2    (c) The bond must be in a form satisfactory to the 3Secretary and shall run to the State of Illinois for the 4benefit of any claimant against the applicant or licensee with 5respect to any activity regulated by this Act, including 6unpaid fees, fines, or penalties owed to the Department. A 7claimant damaged by a breach of the conditions of a bond shall 8have a right of action upon the bond for damages suffered and 9may bring suit directly on the bond, or the Secretary may bring 10suit on behalf of the claimant.  11    Section 32. Relation to other laws. Nothing in this Act 12shall be construed to limit the obligation of a licensee to 13comply with any other applicable laws or rules, including, but 14not limited to, the Predatory Loan Prevention Act. Any 15protections, rights, and remedies provided in this Act to a 16consumer with respect to an agreement with a lender shall be 17intended to supplement and not be exclusive of any 18protections, rights, and remedies otherwise available under 19any other law. 20    Section 33. Limitation on liability. No provision of this 21Act imposes any liability on a lender as a result of the actual 22annual percentage rate charged by a lender differing from the 23estimated annual percentage rate disclosed in conformity with 24any regulation, order, or written interpretive opinion of the   SB3561 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1Secretary or any opinion of the Attorney General, whether or 2not the regulation, order, or written interpretive opinion is 3later amended, rescinded, or repealed or determined by 4judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason. 5    Section 34. Liberal construction and purpose. This Act 6shall be liberally construed to protect consumers. 7    Section 35. Compliance. No person shall be required to 8comply with this Act until January 1, 2028, or a later date 9established by the Department by rule. 10    Section 37. Violations. 11    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to restrict the 12exercise of powers or the performance of the duties of the 13Attorney General that the Attorney General is authorized to 14exercise or perform by law.15    (b) A violation of this Act constitutes an unlawful 16practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 17Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted 18to the Attorney General by the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 19Business Practices Act shall be available to the Attorney 20General for the enforcement of this Act. 21    Section 38. Other licenses. A person holding (i) a license 22under the Consumer Installment Loan Act, (ii) a license under   SB3561 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1the Collection Agency Act, (iii) a license under the Sales 2Finance Agency Act, or (iv) a license identified by the 3Department by rule is not required to be licensed under this 4Act, but is otherwise required to comply with this Act, 5including, but not limited to, the payment of fees relating to 6the activity subject to this Act. The person shall notify the 7Department that it is conducting activity subject to this Act 8at the time of the renewal of the person's license. 9    Section 39. Safe harbor. A person that (i) was providing 10buy-now-pay-later loans in this State before January 1, 2028 11and (ii) submits an application for a license on or before 12January 1, 2028 shall be deemed a provisional licensee 13authorized to continue operating under this Act until the 14Department acts on the application. In addition to any other 15grounds for denying an application under this Act, the 16Department may deny such an application if it finds that the 17applicant's reputation does not warrant the belief that the 18business will be operated honestly and fairly within the 19purposes of this Act and that the applicant does not meet the 20positive net worth requirement. The Department may, by rule, 21extend the compliance date for any provision of this Act. 22    Section 40. Relation to other laws. Any loan made under 23and in compliance with this Act is not required to comply with 24the Consumer Installment Loan Act or the Payday Loan Reform   SB3561 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 20058 SPS 33509 b1Act. 2    Section 900. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 3Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 4    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)5    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Buy-Now-Pay-Later Loan 6Consumer Protection Act. A person who violates the 7Buy-Now-Pay-Later Loan Consumer Protection Act commits an 8unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act. 9    Section 997. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 10the application of the provision is held invalid, the 11invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications 12of the Act which can be given effect without the invalidated 13provision or application. 14    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.